trunk/apertium-es-ro/apertium-es-ro.ro.dix
<pardef n="ajun/ge__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ge</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>g</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>gi</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ge</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>gem</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>geți</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>g</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>geam</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>geai</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>gea</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>geam</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>geați</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>geau</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>sesem</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>seseși</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>sese</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> 
        <p>          
	  <l>sesem</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>seseți</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>seseră</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>g</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>gi</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>gă</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>gem</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>geți</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>gă</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mn"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>   
       <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>să</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>și</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>se</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="fn"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>gându</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>gând</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>gând</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>ge</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>ge</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducând"/>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>gi</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>gă</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>gem</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>geți</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
	</p>
	<par n="S__aducându"/>
      </e>
      <e>
      	<p> 
	  <l>geți</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>  
      <e>
        <p>          
	  <l>gă</l>
	  <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="ajunge">
        <i>ajun</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="atinge">
        <i>atin</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="convinge">
        <i>convin</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="distinge">
        <i>distin</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="distruge">
        <i>distru</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="împinge">
        <i>împin</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="învinge">
        <i>învin</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="plânge">
        <i>plân</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="deplânge" a="mioara" r="LR">
        <i>deplân</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="recurge">
        <i>recur</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="respinge">
        <i>respin</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="scurge">
        <i>scur</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="curge" r="LR">
        <i>cur</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="parcurge" r="LR">
        <i>parcur</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="decurge" a="mioara" r="LR">
        <i>decur</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="smulge">
        <i>smul</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="stinge">
        <i>stin</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="încinge" r="LR">
        <i>încin</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="restrânge" a="delnou">
        <i>restrân</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="strânge">
        <i>strân</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
       <e lm="răsfrânge" r="LR">
        <i>răsfrân</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
<e lm="împunge" a="mioara">
        <i>împun</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
      </e>
<e lm="ajunge la liman" a="mioara" r="LR">
        <i>ajun</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>la<b/>liman</l>
	  <r><g><b/>la<b/>liman</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="ajunge cu bine" a="mioara">
        <i>ajun</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>cu<b/>bine</l>
	  <r><g><b/>cu<b/>bine</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="trage concluzii" a="mioara">
        <i>tra</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>concluzii</l>
	  <r><g><b/>concluzii</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="trage o beție" a="mioara">
        <i>tra</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>o<b/>beție</l>
	  <r><g><b/>o<b/>beție</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="trage la răspundere" a="mioara">
        <i>tra</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>la<b/>răspundere</l>
	  <r><g><b/>la<b/>răspundere</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="trage beții" a="mioara">
        <i>tra</i>
        <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
        <p>
	  <l><b/>beții</l>
	  <r><g><b/>beții</g></r>
	</p>
    </e>
<e lm="unge" a="delia">
  <i>un</i>
  <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
</e>
<e lm="trage o chelfăneală" a="delnou">
  <i>tra</i>
  <par n="ajun/ge__vblex"/>
  <p>
    <l><b/>o<b/>chelfăneală</l>
    <r><g><b/>o<b/>chelfăneală</g></r>
  </p>
</e>
